Hawaii, session 2026, SB2054.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Section 121-30, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended to read as follows: "§121-30 Order to active service.  (a)  In case of war, insurrection, invasion, riot, or imminent danger thereof; an emergency or disaster; [or] danger from flood, fire, storm, earthquake, civil disturbances, or terrorist events; any forcible obstruction to the execution of the laws, or reasonable apprehension thereof; or for assistance to civil authorities in disaster relief or emergency management, the governor may order the national guard or other component of the militia, or any part thereof, into active service.  The governor, or the governor's designated representative, may also order the national guard into active service: (1)  In nonemergency situations for duty and training in addition to the drill and instruction required by section 121-28; (2)  To provide support to other states in response to a request for assistance under the Emergency Management Assistance Compact under chapter 127F; and (3)  To detect, prevent, prepare for, investigate, respond to, or recover from any of the events for which an order to active service may be made. (b) Except as required by federal or state law, the commanding officer of any unit of the armed forces of this State called into active service pursuant to state law or title 32 United States Code shall not assist or cooperate with, or allow time, money, personnel, data, or any other resources to be used to assist, cooperate with, or facilitate, an operation by: (1)  A national guard unit of another state that is deployed in this State if the governor has objected to the deployment; or (2)  Federal troops or law enforcement deployed to this State if the governor has objected to the deployment. (c) The governor's objection required pursuant to subsection (b) shall: (1)  Be made by a written determination signed by the governor; (2)  Specify the deployment request, operation, or activity to which the objection applies; (3)  State the factual basis for the objection; (4)  Specify the geographic scope of the objection; (5)  Specify the effective date, time, and duration of the objection; (6)  Be provided to the adjutant general, administrator of the Hawaii emergency management agency, and attorney general; and (7)  Be maintained as a public record; provided that any information required to be confidential under state or federal law shall not be made public." SECTION 2. Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed and stricken.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 3.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 3000.